Hawaii, session 2025, HB779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Waimanalo research station, an extension office within the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resources, was established in 1950 with a mandate to serve educational and public purposes.  Located on one hundred twenty-eight acres of ceded lands, the Waimanalo research station supports education from kindergarten through twelfth grade, undergraduate, and graduate level aina-based (land-based) program, applied research on locally relevant crops and animals, and the university of Hawaii's extension and GoFarm programs.  Despite the important work conducted at the Waimanalo research station, certain key infrastructure has deteriorated, as the median age of the buildings is approximately forty-four years old.  Additionally, security and theft have emerged as ongoing challenges for the continuity of research at the Waimanalo research station.  Therefore, building maintenance and improvements are needed to ensure the safety of all researchers and students who utilize the research station for the advancement of the State's agricultural practices. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds and appropriate funds for the repair, maintenance, and demolition of buildings at the Waimanalo research station. SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $4,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of financing capital improvement projects as follows: 1. To be expended by the university of Hawaii: A.   Waimanalo research station, Oahu Repair, maintenance, and demolition of buildings at the Waimanalo research station. Construction        $4,000,000 Total funding       $4,000,000 SECTION 3. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________